test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeqddwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼddõl: # Noun 236 'eng /est ädal/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Nom: [äʼddõl, äddõl]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Gen: [äʼddõl, äddõl]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Par: [äʼddõlt, äddõlt]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Dat: [äʼddõlõn, äddõlõn]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ins: [äʼddõlõks, äddõlõks]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ill: [äʼddõlõ, äddõlõ]
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ela: [äʼddõlõst, äddõlõst]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Nom: [äʼddõld, äddõld]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Gen: [äʼddõld, äddõld]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Par: [äʼddiļi, äddiļi]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Dat: [äʼddõldõn, äddõldõn]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ins: [äʼddõldõks, äddõldõks]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ill: [äʼddiļiž, äddiļiž]
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ela: [äʼddiļist, äddiļist]
